Washington statutes.
RCW 43.34.105

Washington state global war on terror memorial account.

(1) The Washington state global war on terror memorial account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. The purpose of the account is to support the establishment and maintenance of the memorial. The secretary of state may solicit and accept moneys from gifts, grants, or endowments for this purpose. All receipts from federal funds, gifts, or grants from the private sector, foundations, or other sources must be deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account may be used only for the design, siting, permitting, construction, maintenance, dedication, or creation of educational materials related to placement of this memorial on the capital campus. Only the secretary of state, or the secretary of state's designee, may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but appropriation is not required for expenditures.

(2) The secretary of state may adopt rules governing the receipt and use of these funds.

[ 2022 c 191 s 13.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2022 c 191: See note following RCW 43.60A.260.